Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.160

Funding or refunding bonds—Recourse of bond owners.

When such funding or refunding bonds have been issued and the city or town fails to set aside and pay into the special fund from which they are payable, the amount without regard to any fixed proportion out of the gross revenue of the public utility which the city or town has, by ordinance, bound and obligated itself to set aside and pay into the special fund, the owner of any funding or refunding bond may bring action against the city or town and compel such setting aside and payment.

[ 1983 c 167 s 70; 1965 c 7 s 35.92.160. Prior: 1935 c 81 s 5; RRS s 9492-5. Formerly RCW 80.40.160.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.